Maine, session 132, LD67.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1811, first ¶, as amended by PL 1989, c. 136, §1 and c. 572,
§1 and repealed and replaced by c. 878, Pt. A, §58, is further amended to read:
No A person, partnership, association or corporation, nor or any state, county or local
governmental units, may not establish, conduct or maintain in the State any hospital,
sanatorium, convalescent home, rest home, nursing home, ambulatory surgical facility,
urgent care facility or other institution for the hospitalization or nursing care of human
beings without first obtaining a license therefor. Hospital, sanatorium, convalescent home,
rest home, nursing home, ambulatory surgical facility and other related institution, within
the meaning of this chapter, means any institution, place, building or agency in which any
accommodation is maintained, furnished or offered for the hospitalization of the sick or
injured or care of any aged or infirm persons requiring or receiving chronic or convalescent
care. Nothing in this chapter may This chapter does not apply to hotels or other similar
places that furnish only board and room, or either, to their guests or to such homes for the
aged or blind as may be subject to licensing under any other law.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1812-M is enacted to read:
§1812-M. Urgent care facility
1. Definition. As used in this chapter, "urgent care facility" means a health care
facility that is not otherwise licensed with a primary purpose of providing medical
evaluation and care on a walk-in basis for non-life-threatening injuries and illnesses and
that does not have a physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner on site to provide
patient care. "Urgent care facility" does not include:
A. A facility that is licensed as part of a hospital;
B. A facility that provides services or accommodations for patients who stay overnight;
or
C. The private office of a physician or dentist in individual or group practice.
Page 1 - 132LR0285(03)

2. Standards. The department shall establish standards for the licensure of urgent
care facilities effective July 1, 2026. The standards must include a licensure fee of not less
than $50 and not more than $500 and address staffing, quality of care, advertising and
promotion, inspections and complaint investigations and accreditation.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2053, sub-§3-A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 72, §1, is further
amended to read:
3-A. Health care facility. "Health care facility" means a nursing home that is, or will
be upon completion, licensed under chapter 405; a residential care facility that is, or will
be upon completion, licensed under chapter 1663; a continuing care retirement community
that is, or will be upon completion, licensed under Title 24‑A, chapter 73; an assisted living
facility that is, or will be upon completion, licensed under chapter 1664; a hospital; a
community mental health facility; a scene response air ambulance licensed under Title 32,
chapter 2‑B and the rules adopted thereunder; a facility of a hospice program that is, or will
be upon completion, licensed under chapter 1681; a nonprofit statewide health information
network incorporated in the State for the purpose of exchanging health care information
among licensed health care providers in the State; or a community health center; or an
urgent care facility licensed under section 1812-M.
Page 2 - 132LR0285(03)